Nebraska, session 109, LB1194.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1194 LB1194
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Real Food Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that: (a) A significant portion
of the population suffers from chronic diseases linked to poor dietary
habits; and (b) a concerted effort to prioritize nutrient-dense whole
foods can dramatically improve the health trajectory of the state.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to: (a) Formally adopt
state-level dietary guidelines based on current nutritional science; (b)
promote educational initiatives to support individuals and families in
adopting healthier dietary practices; and (c) enhance food security and
support state and local agriculture.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Real Food Act, dietary guidelines means
a whole food framework customized to individuals and families, taking
into consideration an individual's or family's needs, preferences, and
financial status.
Sec. 4. The state's dietary guidelines for public health promotion
are:
(1) High-quality, nutrient-dense protein foods shall be prioritized
in every meal. This includes a variety of animal sources, including red
meat, eggs, poultry, seafood, and plant-sourced protein foods, including
beans, peas, lentils, legumes, nuts, seeds, and soy;
(2) The bulk of fat consumption shall be encouraged from whole food
sources, including meats, poultry, eggs, omega 3–rich seafood, nuts,
seeds, full-fat dairy products, olives, and avocados. Nutrient-dense
natural options with essential fatty acids shall be recommended for
cooking;
(3) Eating a variety of colorful, nutrient-dense vegetables and
fruits as foundational components of daily meals shall be encouraged.
Whole vegetables and fruits in their original form shall be prioritized,
including appropriate washing prior to consumption when eaten raw or
before cooking. Frozen, dried, or canned vegetables and fruits with no,
-2-

LB1194 LB1194
2026 2026
or limited, added sugars may also be encouraged as nutritious and
accessible options. Consumption of a broad range of vegetable types and
fruit varieties shall be promoted to support overall nutrient intake;
(4) Consumption of dairy foods shall be encouraged as an important
component of a nutrient-dense diet. When consuming dairy, individuals
shall be directed to include full-fat dairy products with no added
sugars. Dairy is recognized as an excellent source of protein, healthy
fats, vitamins, and minerals. Recommended options include milk, cheese,
yogurt, and other dairy products in forms consistent with individual
dietary needs and preferences; and
(5) Fiber-rich whole grains shall be prioritized to significantly
reduce the consumption of refined carbohydrates.
Sec. 5. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services, the
Department of Agriculture, and the State Department of Education may
develop and implement a statewide public awareness campaign to educate
residents on the importance of adhering to the dietary guidelines
described in section 4 of this act.
(2) All state agencies involved in public nutrition, school lunch
programs, and health care services shall update educational materials to
align with the dietary guidelines described in section 4 of this act
including identification of foods commonly produced in Nebraska. Updates
to educational materials shall be implemented during the next scheduled
revision cycle.
(3) All state agencies involved in public nutrition, school lunch
programs, and health care services may establish partnerships with local
governments, health care providers, educators, and community leaders to
promote adherence to the dietary guidelines described in section 4 of
this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
-3-